Hawaii statutes.
§24-4 Allowance for expenses while on
official legislative business during period of recess and interim official
legislative business. When a session of the legislature is recessed for
more than three days pursuant to a concurrent resolution or for any interim
official legislative business, a member of the legislature while on official
legislative business on the island of the member's legal residence and when
authorized by the presiding officer of the respective house, shall receive an
allowance of $10 a day to cover personal expenses.

When a session of the legislature is recessed
for more than three days pursuant to the mandatory recess required by article
III, section 10, of the Constitution or a concurrent resolution or for any
interim official legislative business, a member of the legislature who is
required to remain away from the island of the member's legal residence but
within the State overnight or longer while on official legislative business and
when authorized by the presiding officer of the respective house, shall receive
an allowance to cover all personal expenses such as board, lodging, and
incidental expenses but not travel expenses. The allowance under this section
shall be set at a single rate that will:

(1) Not exceed the greater of the maximum allowance
for such expenses payable to any public officer or employee of the federal
government or the State;

(2) Be reasonably calculated to cover the expenses
specified in this section; and

(3) Be determined jointly by the president of the senate
and the speaker of the house of representatives for the legislature as a whole.
[L 1969, c 5, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 2, §3 and c 164, §1(2); gen ch 1985; am L
2005, c 222, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next